Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 2 Appointment

53-6-10.
Nomination by testator.

No formal words are necessary for the nomination of an executor. An expression by the testator of a desire that the person carry into effect the testator’s wishes shall amount to a nomination as executor.

Unless adjudged unfit, nominated executors shall have the right to qualify in the order set out in the will.

An individual who has not reached the age of majority may be nominated as an executor but may not qualify until reaching the age of majority.

If the will names a person to fill a vacancy in the office of executor or provides a method of selecting a personal representative to fill the vacancy, any vacancy shall be filled or selection made as provided in the will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Administration of ward’s estate by guardian, §§

29-2-23

,

29-2-24

,

29-2-42

et seq.

Age of majority, §

39-1-1

.

53-6-11.
Qualification.

If the nominated executor does not qualify within 90 days after the order admitting the will to probate is entered or is proved to be dead or incapacitated or renounces the right to serve, the next nominated executor in the order set out in the will may qualify. If the next nominated executor fails to qualify within 90 days after the expiration of the time period by which the first nominated executor must qualify or is proved to be dead or incapacitated or renounces the right to serve, any nominated executor may qualify. If no nominated executor appears to qualify within a reasonable time or if there is no other executor named in the will, the estate shall be deemed to be unrepresented.

A nominated executor who fails to qualify within the time period set out in subsection (a) of this Code section is deemed to have declined the right to serve as executor; provided, however, that this declination does not preclude the nominated executor from qualifying to serve as executor or administrator with the will annexed at a later time.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 20.

Cross references.

Tolling of limitations during period between death of person and commencement of representation upon his estate, §§

9-3-92

,

9-3-93

.

53-6-12.
Declination.

A nominated executor may decline in writing the right to serve as executor, but this shall not preclude the nominated executor from qualifying at a later time to serve as executor or administrator with the will annexed to fill a vacancy.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-6-13.
Appointment by court.

Unless another nominated executor qualifies within the time provided in Code Section 53-6-11, the probate court shall appoint an administrator with the will annexed of a testate estate when:

No executor is nominated in the will;

The nominated executor has not reached the age of majority, to serve until the disability ceases;

The executor dies, resigns, or otherwise becomes disqualified to serve; or

A testate estate is unrepresented for any other reason.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-6-14.
Selection by beneficiaries.

For purposes of this Code section, a beneficiary who is capable of expressing a choice is one:

Who has a present interest, including but not limited to a vested remainder interest but not including trust beneficiaries where there is a trustee; and

Whose identity and whereabouts are known or may be determined by reasonable diligence.

An administrator with the will annexed may be unanimously selected by the beneficiaries of the will who are capable of expressing a choice unless the sole beneficiary is the decedent’s surviving spouse and an action for divorce or separate maintenance was pending between the decedent and the surviving spouse at the time of death. When no such unanimous selection is made, the probate court shall make the appointment that will best serve the interests of the estate, considering the following preferences:

Any beneficiary or the trustee of any trust that is a beneficiary under the will; or

Those persons listed in paragraphs (3) through (5) of Code Section 53-6-20.

For purposes of this Code section, a beneficiary’s choice is expressed by:

That beneficiary, if the beneficiary is sui juris;

That beneficiary’s duly acting conservator or guardian or, if there is no conservator or guardian, the person having custody of the beneficiary, if the beneficiary is not sui juris;

The trustee of a trust that is a beneficiary under the will, where there is a trustee;

The beneficiary of a trust that is a beneficiary under the will, where there is no trustee; provided, however, that for purposes of this paragraph, a trust beneficiary may be represented as provided in Code Section 53-12-8; or

The personal representative of a deceased beneficiary receiving a present interest under the will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 11; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-29/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (c), inserted “the beneficiary is” in paragraph (c)(1), substituted “duly acting conservator or guardian or, if there is no conservator or guardian” for “guardian or, if none” in paragraph (c)(2), substituted “will, where there is a trustee;’ for “will; or” at the end of paragraph (c)(3), inserted paragraph (c)(4) and redesignated former paragraph (c)(4) as paragraph (c)(5).

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-6-15.
Petition for letters of administration with will annexed.

Every petition for letters of administration with the will annexed shall be made in accordance with the procedures set forth in Code Section 53-5-21 if the will has not yet been admitted to probate and shall include a prayer for issuance of letters of administration with the will annexed. Such petition shall set forth the names, addresses, and ages or majority status of the beneficiaries who are capable of expressing a choice, as defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 53-6-14, and the circumstances giving rise to the need for an administrator with the will annexed. Such petition and the citation issued thereon shall be served by the court on the beneficiaries of the will who are capable of expressing a choice in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of this title. If the petition for letters of administration with the will annexed is based upon the expiration of a reasonable time for any nominated executor to qualify, any nominated executor who has failed to qualify shall also be served with notice by the court in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of this title.

If the will has been admitted to probate, the petition for letters of administration with the will annexed shall set forth the names, addresses, and ages or majority status of the beneficiaries who are capable of expressing a choice, as described in subsection (a) of Code Section 53-6-14, the date on which the will was admitted to probate, and the circumstances giving rise to the need for an administrator with the will annexed. Such petition and the citation issued thereon shall be served by the court on the beneficiaries of the will and the personal representative, if any, of the estate of any deceased executor whose death created the vacancy in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of this title.

In the case of an estate partially administered and unrepresented because of the death of the previous executor, the judge shall determine whether the interest of the first estate and the persons interested in the first estate will best be served by the appointment of an administrator with the will annexed or of the executor, if any, appointed under the will of the deceased previous executor.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 12; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 21; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-30/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “Such petition” for “The petition” at the beginning of the second and third sentences, in the third sentence, substituted “and the citation issued thereon shall be served by the court”,
for “shall be served”’, and substituted “provided by Chapter 11” for “described in Chapter 11”, and added “with notice by the court in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of this title” at the end of the last sentence; in subsection (b), in the last sentence, substituted “Such petition and the citation issued thereon shall be served by the court” for “The petition shall be served” substituted “personal representative, if any, of the estate of” for “executor, if any of”, and substituted “provided by Chapter 11” for “described in Chapter 11”; and, in subsection (c), substituted “best be served” for “be best served” and inserted “of” preceding “the executor”.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-6-16.
Oath or affirmation of executor and administrator with will annexed.

Every executor and every administrator with the will annexed, upon qualification, shall take and subscribe an oath or affirmation in substantially the following form:

Click to view

The oath or affirmation of an executor or administrator with the will annexed as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section may be subscribed before the judge or clerk of any probate court of this state. The probate court appointing the executor or administrator with the will annexed shall have the authority to grant a commission to a judge or clerk of any court of record of any other state to administer the oath or affirmation.

“I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that this writing contains the true last will of
, deceased, so far as I know or believe, and that I will well and truly execute the same in accordance with the laws of Georgia. So help me God.”

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.